Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 1 COUNTY BOUNDARIES AND COUNTY SEATS
§ 31-130. Kootenai county.

Kootenai county is described as follows: beginning at the point of intersection of the west boundary line of Shoshone county with the north boundary line of section twenty-two (22), township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) east;

Southern boundary. Thence west along the north boundary line of sections twenty-two (22), twenty-one (21), twenty (20) and nineteen (19), township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) east, to the point of intersection with the Boise meridian; thence along said Boise meridian, to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) west; thence west along the north boundary line of sections twenty-four (24), twenty-three (23), twenty-two (22), twenty-one (21), twenty (20) and nineteen (19), township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) west, to the range line between township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) west, and township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence along said last mentioned range line to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence continuing west along the north boundary lines of sections twenty-four (24), twenty-three (23), twenty-two (22), to the northwest corner of section twenty-two (22), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence south along the west line of section twenty-two (22), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west, to the northwest corner of section twenty-seven (27), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence west along the north line of sections twenty-eight (28) and twenty-nine (29), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west, to the northwest corner of section twenty-nine (29), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence south along the west line of sections twenty-nine (29) and thirty-two (32), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-two (32), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence west along the township line between townships forty-six (46) and forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west, to the intersection of the range line between ranges two (2) and three (3) west; thence continuing west along the township line between townships forty-six (46) and forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west; thence north along the west line of section thirty-three (33), township forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west, to the northwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west; thence west along the north line of sections thirty-two (32) and thirty-one (31), township forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west, to the range line between ranges three (3) and four (4) west; thence south along said range line to the northeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west; thence west along the north line of section thirty-six (36) and thirty-five (35), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west, to the northwest corner of section thirty-five (35), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west; thence south along the west line of said section thirty-five (35), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west, to the southwest corner of said section thirty-five (35), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west; thence west along the north line of township forty-six (46) north, ranges four (4), five (5) and six (6) west (1915, ch. 4, section 3, pp. 7, 8), to the point of intersection of the Idaho-Washington state line with the northern boundary line of township forty-six (46) north of the Boise base line;

Western boundary. Thence north along said state boundary line to a point where the same is intersected by the line between townships fifty-three (53) and fifty-four (54) north;
Northern boundary. Thence east along said township line between townships fifty-three (53) and fifty-four (54) north, to the northeast corner of township fifty-three (53) north, range three (3) west; thence north on the range line between sections thirty-six (36) and thirty-one (31) to the northeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township fifty-four (54) north, range three (3) west; thence east six (6) miles, to the northeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township fifty-four (54) north, range two (2) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one (1) and two (2) west, to the southwest corner of township fifty-three (53) north, range one (1) west; thence east on the township line between townships fifty-two (52) and fifty-three (53) north, to the intersection of the said line with the western boundary of Shoshone county (1909, p. 318);

Eastern boundary. Thence south along the western boundary of Shoshone county, to the point of beginning (1915, ch. 4, section 2, p. 6).

County seat — Coeur d’Alene.

§ 31-131. Latah county.

Latah county is described as follows: beginning at a point where the middle line of township thirty-seven (37) north intersects the boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Washington;

Western boundary. Thence north along the said boundary line to a point where the watershed between Hangman’s creek and Palouse river crosses the said boundary line;

Northern boundary. Thence in a southeasterly direction along the said watershed to a point where this line crosses the section line between sections twenty-seven (27) and twenty-eight (28), township forty-three (43) north, range four (4) west; thence south on the said section line to the section corner common to sections twenty-seven (27), twenty-eight (28), thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), in the same township and range; thence east on this section line to the eastern boundary of the said township and range; thence north on the range line to the northwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township forty-three (43) north, range three (3) west; thence east along the section line running on the north of said section thirty-one (31), to the northeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-three (43) north, range one (1) west; thence south one (1) mile, to the township line between townships forty-two (42) and forty-three (43) north; thence east along the said township line to a point directly north of the mouth of the North Fork of the Clearwater river;

Eastern boundary. Thence south to the middle line of township thirty-eight (38) north;

Southern boundary. Thence west on the middle line of township thirty-eight (38) north to the point of intersection of said middle line and the center of Big Potlatch creek; thence along the average center of said creek south 41°29′00″ west 433.17 feet; thence south 83°01′30″ west 555.76 feet; thence north 72°43′45″ west 486.51 feet; thence north 41°28′30″ west 762.95 feet; thence north 72°52′00″ west 134.45 feet; to a point which is north 358.29 feet from the corner common to Sections 16, 17, 20 and 21, township thirty-eight (38) north, range 2 west, Boise Meridian; thence north 72°52′00″ west 2007.63 feet; thence south 48°22′30″ west 949.70 feet; thence north 88°25′15″ west 1485.48 feet; thence south 45°57′45″ west 770.90 feet; thence north 82°46′15″ west 750.35 feet; thence south 43°28′45″ west 1160.84 feet; thence south 65°32′00″ west 804.18 feet; thence south 46°29′30″ west 527.72 feet; thence south 53°01′15″ west 717.00 feet; to a point which is south 2073.86 feet from the one-quarter corner common to Sections 18 and 19 township thirty-eight (38) north, range 2 west, Boise Meridian; thence south 53°01′15″ west 685.19 feet; thence south 30°54′30″ west 1373.34 feet; thence south 84°44′45″ west 1151.76 feet; thence south 21°04′00″ east 1132.26 feet; thence south 05°04′00″ west 902.41 feet; thence south 78°56′15″ west 493.86 feet; to a point which is south 657.49 feet from the corner common to Sections 24, 19, 31 and 25, township thirty-eight (38) north, range 3 west and range 2 west, Boise Meridian; thence south 78°56′15″ west 136.97 feet; thence north 87°54′15″ west 2370.65 feet; thence south 73°27′15″ west 1216.03 feet; thence south 34°56′45″ west 2443.32 feet; thence south 55°35′15″ west 258.89 feet to a point which is south 447.50 feet from the one-quarter corner common to Sections 26 and 25, township thirty-eight (38) north, range 3 west, Boise Meridian; thence south 55°35′15″ west 2071.08 feet; thence south 42°55′30″ west 1609.29 feet; to a point which is located west 2811.85 feet from the corner common to Sections 26, 25, 36 and 35, township thirty-eight (38) north, range 3 west, Boise Meridian; thence south 44°33′29″ west 950.95 feet; thence south 07°36′44″ west 869.85 feet; thence south 28°34′42″ west 740.46 feet; thence south 30°26′40″ west 397.99 feet; thence south 03°38′57″ west 618.32 feet; thence south 38°21′12″ west 690.57 feet; thence south 54°22′07″ west 56.90 feet; thence south 69°39′54″ west 343.03 feet; thence south 82°19′22″ west 333.65 feet; thence south 65°55′57″ west 647.97 feet; thence south 63°14′18″ west 784.25 feet; thence north 85°46′49″ west 1140.68 feet; thence south 37°18′55″ west 820.62 feet; thence south 30°42′01″ west 840.83 feet; thence south 02°55′30″ east 1395.50 feet; thence south 10°47′35″ west 233.84 feet; thence south 52°26′42″ west 474.82 feet; thence south 31°23′33″ west 1307.49 feet; thence south 15°45′00″ west 732.84 feet; thence south 10°27′38″ east 755.37 feet to a point which is east 662.51 feet and north 02°06′09″ west 8.57 feet from the corner common to Sections 3, 4, 9 and 10 township thirty-seven (37) north, range 3 west, Boise Meridian, which corner is marked by a Brass Cap Monument set 1556.70 feet east of said corner set by James W. Grow, R.L.S. #749; thence south 02°06′09″ east 317.10 feet; thence south 11°10′52″ west 528.81 feet; thence south 33°23′33″ west 1343.54 feet; thence south 18°47′37″ east 514.74 feet; thence south 18°33′57″ west 902.43 feet; thence south 10°36′14″ west 654.11 feet; thence south 21°02′12″ west 343.00 feet; thence south 31°52′33″ west 896.41 feet, to a point that is west 983.97 feet and north 05°04′43″ east 80.67 feet from the corner common to Sections 9, 10, 15 and 16, township thirty-seven (37) north, range 3 west, Boise Meridian, being marked by a 5/8″ iron pin set in a mound of stone by James W. Grow, R.L.S. #749, and by a Brass Cap Monument set 1136.66 feet west of said section corner; thence south 05°04′43″ west 488.49 feet; thence south 15°20′14″ west 272.28 feet; thence south 27°52′57″ west 661.93 feet; thence south 57°36′12″ west 456.93 feet; thence south 21°50′14″ west 385.38 feet; thence south 12°45′28″ east 367.96 feet; thence south 67°00′39″ east 464.34 feet; thence south 22°07′05″ west 1097.33 feet; thence south 33°13′49″ west 576.62 feet; thence south 13°03′47″ east 296.08 feet; thence south 34°16′41″ west 1198.35 feet; thence south 21°36′07″ west 183.18 feet to a point on the north line of Section 21, township thirty-seven (37) north, range 3 west, Boise Meridian, said point being east 1482.32 feet from the northwest corner of said Section 21, which corner is marked by a Brass Cap Monument lying east 1845.18 feet from said corner; thence west along the middle line of township thirty-seven (37) north to the point of beginning.
County Seat — Moscow.

§ 31-132. Lemhi county.

Lemhi county is described as follows: beginning at a point where the divide between the watersheds of the Salmon river and the Clearwater river in the state of Idaho intersect the boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Montana; thence in a southwesterly direction along said divide to its junction with the divide between the watershed of Horse creek on the east and watershed of Squaw creek and other creeks on the west; thence southerly along said divide between Horse creek on the east, and Squaw creek and other creeks on the west, to Salmon river; thence along the center line of the middle of the stream of Salmon river southeasterly and up stream to the confluence of the Middle Fork of Salmon river with the main Salmon river in the state of Idaho; thence southerly along the center line of the middle of the channel of the said Middle Fork of the Salmon river to the mouth of Loon creek (1903, p. 48); thence up Loon creek to the mouth of Warm Spring creek; thence up Warm Spring creek to the divide which separates the waters of Yankee Fork on the south and Loon and Deep creeks on the north, and following the said divide in an easterly direction around the head of Panther creek to the divide between Hat creek and Ellis creek; thence on the divide between Hat and Ellis creeks in an easterly direction to the Salmon river; thence up the main channel of said Salmon river to the confluence of the Pahsimeroi river with the Salmon river; thence up the Pahsimeroi river to the mouth of Big creek; thence up Big creek and on a line from the head thereof with a general course of the said creek to the summit of the divide between the waters of the Pahsimeroi river and the Lemhi river; thence southeasterly on the summit of the said divide to a point west from the headwaters of the Little Lost river; thence east to the headwaters of the Little Lost river; thence down the Little Lost river (15 Ter. Sess. 26) to the intersection of the same with the township line between townships ten (10) and eleven (11) north; thence east along the said township line (1899, p. 111), to the southwest corner of township eleven (11) north, range thirty-one (31) east; thence north along the range line between ranges thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) east, to the intersection of the same with the boundary line of the state of Montana (1899, p. 273); thence generally in a northwesterly direction along the said state boundary line to the point of beginning.

County seat—Salmon.

§ 31-133. Lewis county.

Lewis county is described as follows: beginning at the mouth of Lolo creek;

Northern boundary. Thence in a northerly direction down the middle of the channel of the Clearwater river to a point where the seventh (7th) standard parallel north crosses the Clearwater river; thence west along said parallel to a point where the same intersects Little Canyon creek; thence down the center of the channel of Little Canyon creek to a point where the same empties into Big Canyon creek; thence up the center of the channel of the Big Canyon creek to a point where the same crosses the township line between townships thirty-four (34) and thirty-five (35) north; thence west on said township line, to a point where the same crosses Mission creek;

Western boundary. Thence up the middle of the channel of Mission creek to a point where the same crosses the township line between townships thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34) north; thence west on said township line to the northeast corner of section four (4), township thirty-three (33) north, range three (3) west; thence south on section lines to the center of the channel of Salmon river;

Southern boundary. Thence up the center of the channel of Salmon river to the mouth of Deep creek; thence up the middle of the channel of Deep creek to the mouth of the Right Fork of Deep creek; thence up the middle of the channel of the Right Fork of Deep creek to a point where the line between ranges one (1) and two (2) west, crosses said Deep creek; thence north along said line to the point where the said line crosses Willow creek; thence down the middle of the channel of Willow creek to its junction with Lawyer’s canyon; thence down the middle of the channel of Lawyer’s canyon to its junction with the Clearwater river;

Eastern boundary. Thence down the middle of the channel of Clearwater river to the mouth of Lolo creek, the place of beginning.

County seat—Nez Perce.

§ 31-134. Lincoln county.

Lincoln county is described as follows: beginning at the northeast corner of section six (6), township three (3) south, range sixteen (16) east;

Western boundary. Thence south twenty-four (24) miles, more or less, along the section line to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) south, range sixteen (16) east;

Southern boundary. Thence easterly along the township line to the northwest corner of section four (4), township seven (7) south, range eighteen (18) east; thence south along the section line to the southwest corner of section nine (9), township seven (7) south, range eighteen (18) east; thence east along the section line to the southeast corner of section nine (9), township seven (7) south, range eighteen (18) east; thence south along the section line to the southwest corner of section fifteen (15), township seven (7) south, range eighteen (18) east; thence east along the section line to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township seven (7) south, range twenty-one (21) east; thence south along the range line to the southwest corner of township seven (7) south, range twenty-one (21) east; thence east along the township line to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township seven (7) south, range twenty-three (23) east;

Eastern boundary. Thence north along section line to the north line of township seven (7) south, range twenty-three (23) east; thence easterly along the township line to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township six (6) south, range twenty-three (23) east; thence northerly along a line which is three (3) miles west of and generally parallel to the east line of range twenty-three (23) east, north of the first standard parallel south, to the north line of township three (3) south, range twenty-three (23) east (1913, ch. 3, section 2, p. 5);

Northern boundary. Thence west along the township line between townships two (2) and three (3) south, to the place of beginning (R.C., section 23q).

County seat — Shoshone.

§ 31-135. Madison county.

Madison county is described as follows: beginning at the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township four (4) north, range forty-one (41) east (1913, ch. 26, section 2, p. 108);

Southern boundary. Thence easterly along the township line between townships three (3) and four (4) north (R.C. 23
l
) to a point two (2) miles east of the range line which, when surveyed, will be between ranges forty-two (42) and forty-three (43) east (1915, ch. 8, section 2, p. 30);

Eastern boundary. Thence north to the center of the main channel of Teton river, where said river intersects the section line between sections sixteen (16) and seventeen (17), township seven (7) north, range forty-three (43) east (1915, ch. 8, section 2, p. 30);

Northern boundary. Thence down the center of the main channel of said Teton river to where the same intersects the range line between ranges forty-one (41) and forty-two (42) east; thence south to the township line between townships six (6) and seven (7) north; thence west to the southeast corner of section thirty-five (35), township seven (7) north, range forty (40) east; thence north one (1) mile, to the northeast corner of section thirty-five (35); thence west to the northeast corner of section thirty-four (34), township seven (7) north, range thirty-nine (39) east; thence north two (2) miles to the northeast twenty-one (21) and twenty-two (22), township and range last aforesaid, thence west to the northeast corner of section twenty-one (21), township seven (7) north, range thirty-eight (38) east;

Western boundary. Thence south on the section line between sections twenty-one (21) and twenty-two (22), township and range last aforesaid, to the township line between townships six (6) and seven (7) north; thence continuing in a southerly direction on the line which, when surveyed, will be the section line between sections three (3) and four (4), township six (6) north, range thirty-eight (38) east, to the southern boundary of said township; thence south along the section line between sections three (3) and four (4), township five (5) north, range thirty-eight (38) east, to where the same intersects the center of the main channel of the Snake river; thence up the center channel of said Snake river to the junction of the North and South Forks of the Snake river, and continuing up the center channel of said South Fork of Snake river to where the same intersects the section line that runs due east between sections twenty-three (23) and twenty-six (26), township four (4) north, range forty (40) east; thence east on said section line last aforesaid in said last mentioned township and range to the northeast corner of section twenty-eight (28), township four (4) north, range forty-one (41) east; thence south two (2) miles to the place of beginning (1913, ch. 26, section 2, p. 109).

County seat—Rexburg.

§ 31-136. Minidoka county.

Minidoka county is described as follows: beginning at the point where the center line of the Snake river is intersected by the west section line of section nineteen (19), township ten (10) south, range twenty-two (22) east;

Western boundary. Thence northerly along the township line to the northwest corner of township eight (8) south, range twenty-two (22) east; thence easterly along the township line to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township seven (7) south, range twenty-three (23) east; thence north along the section line to the north line of township seven (7) south, range twenty-three (23) east; thence easterly along the township line to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township six (6) south, range twenty-three (23) east; thence northerly along a line which is three (3) miles west of and generally parallel to the east line of range twenty-three (23) east, north of the first standard parallel south, to the north line of township three (3) south, range twenty-three (23) east;

Northern boundary. Thence easterly along said township line (1913, ch. 3, section 2, pp. 5, 6) to the intersection of the same with the line between ranges twenty-five (25) and twenty-six (26) east; thence south along the said range line (R.C., section 23e), to its intersection with the center line of Snake river; thence southwesterly along said center line of Snake river, to the point of beginning (1913, ch. 3, section 2, p. 6).

County seat — Rupert.

§ 31-137. Nez Perce county.

Nez Perce county is described as follows: beginning at the northwest corner of section twenty-two (22), township thirty-eight (38) north, range one (1) west;

Eastern boundary. Thence south to the north boundary line of the Nez Perce Indian reservation; thence easterly along said reservation line to the intersection of the same with the line running south between sections fifteen (15) and sixteen (16), township thirty-seven (37) north, range one (1) west; thence south on the said line between sections fifteen (15) and sixteen (16), to the middle of the channel of Clearwater river; thence up the middle of the channel of said Clearwater river to a point where the same is intersected by the section line between sections five (5) and six (6), township thirty-six (36) north, range one (1) east; thence south on the section line between said sections five (5) and six (6) to the middle of the channel of Little Canyon creek (1911, ch. 24, section 2, p. 50); thence down the center of the channel of Little Canyon creek to a point where the same empties into Big Canyon creek; thence up the center of the channel of Big Canyon creek to a point where the same crosses the township line between townships thirty-four (34) and thirty-five (35) north; thence west on said township line to a point where the same crosses Mission creek; thence up the middle of the channel of Mission creek to a point where the same crosses the township line between townships thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34) north; thence west on said township line to the northeast corner of section four (4), township thirty-three (33) north, range three (3) west; thence south on section lines to the center of the channel of Salmon river (1911, ch. 37, section 2, pp. 77, 78);

Southern boundary. Thence down the middle of the channel of Salmon river to a point in the middle of the channel of Snake river opposite the junction of Salmon river;

Western boundary. Thence northerly along the boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Washington to the point where said boundary line is intersected by the middle line of township thirty-seven (37) north;

Northern boundary. Thence east to a point where the Big Potlatch creek intersects with the said middle line of township thirty-seven (37) north; being at the northwest corner of Section 21, T.37N., R.3W. B.M., which corner is marked by a Brass Cap Monument lying east 1845.18 feet from said corner; thence east 1482.82 feet along the north line of said Section 21 to the centerline of Potlatch river, being the point of beginning of said county line; thence continue northerly along the centerline of said Potlatch river the following courses: N.21°36′07″E. 183.18 feet; thence N.34°16′41″E. 1198.35 feet; thence N.13°03′47″W. 296.08 feet; thence N.33°13′49″E. 576.62 feet; thence N.22°07′05″E. 1097.33 feet; thence N.67°00′39″W. 464.34 feet; thence N.12°45′28″W. 367.96 feet; thence N.21°50′14″E. 385.38 feet; thence N.57°36′12″E. 456.93 feet; thence N.27°52′57″E. 661.93 feet; thence N.15°20′14″E. 272.28 feet; thence N.5°04′43″E. 488.49 feet to a point that is west 983.97 feet and N.5°04′43″E. 80.67 feet from the corner common to Sections 9, 10, 15, and 16, T.37N., R.3W. B.M., being marked by a 5/8″ iron pin set in a mound of stone by James W. Grow, R.L.S. #749, and by a Brass Cap Monument set 1136.66 feet west of said Section corner; thence continue along the centerline of Potlatch river N.31°52′33″E. 896.41 feet; thence N.21°02′12″E. 343.00 feet; thence N.10°36′14″E. 654.11 feet; thence N.18°33′57″E. 902.43 feet; thence N.18°47′37″W. 514.74 feet; thence N.33°23′33″E. 1343.54 feet; thence N.11°10′52″E. 528.81 feet; thence N.2°06′09″W. 317.10 feet to a point which is east 662.51 feet and N.2°06′09″W. 8.57 feet from the corner common to Sections 3, 4, 9 and 10, T.37N., R.3W. B.M., which corner is marked by a Brass Cap Monument set 1556.70 feet east of said corner set by James W. Grow, R.L.S. #749; thence continue along the centerline of Potlatch river N.10°27′38″W. 755.37 feet; thence N.15°45′00″E. 732.84 feet; thence N.31°23′33″E. 1307.49 feet; thence N.52°26′42″E. 474.82 feet; thence N.10°47′35″E. 233.84 feet; thence N.2°55′30″W. 1395.50 feet; thence N.30°42′01″E. 840.83 feet; thence N.37°18′55″E. 820.62 feet; thence S.85°46′49″E. 1140.68 feet; thence N.63°14′18″E. 784.25 feet; thence N.65°55′57″E. 647.97 feet; thence N.82°19′22″E. 333.65 feet; thence N.69°39′54″E. 343.03 feet; thence N.54°22′07″E. 56.90 feet; thence N.38°21′12″E. 690.57 feet; thence N.3°38′57″E. 618.32 feet; thence N.30°26′40″E. 397.99 feet; thence N.28°34′42″E. 740.46 feet; thence N.7°36′44″E. 869.85 feet; thence N.44°33′29″E. 950.95 feet to a point on the north line of Section 35, T.38N., R.3W. B.M., being the point of terminus of said county line. Said point being west 2811.24 feet from the northeast corner of said Section 35, which is marked by a Brass Cap Monument set 3091.98 feet west of said corner, being set by James W. Grow, R.L.S. #749.
County seat—Lewiston.

§ 31-138. Oneida county.

Oneida county is described as follows: beginning at a point where the one hundred thirteenth (113th) meridian west from Greenwich intersects with the southern line of township twelve (12) south;

Western boundary. Thence south along the said meridian to a point where said meridian intersects with the northern boundary line of the state of Utah (R.C., section 23s);

Southern boundary. Thence easterly along said boundary line to a point on the boundary line between the states of Utah and Idaho, where the same is intersected by the section line between sections twenty-six (26) and twenty-seven (27), township sixteen (16) south, range thirty-seven (37) east;

Eastern boundary. Thence in a northerly direction along the section line as now surveyed to the southeast corner of section twenty-seven (27), township fourteen (14) south, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence easterly along said section line as now surveyed to the southeast corner of section twenty-six (26), township fourteen (14) south, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence continuing easterly along said line to a point which, when surveyed, will be the southeast corner of section twenty-five (25), township fourteen (14) south, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence northerly along the western boundary of township fourteen (14) south, range thirty-eight (38) east, as now surveyed, to its intersection with the boundary line (1913, ch. 5, section 2, pp. 22, 23) of Bannock county; thence west along the boundary line of Bannock county to a point on the top of the range west of a point one (1) mile south of the present southern boundary of the townsite of Oxford; thence northwesterly along the crest of the mountains between Malad and Marsh valleys to an intersection of the township line between ranges thirty-six (36) and thirty-seven (37) east, Boise meridian, thence north to the east quarter (E¼) corner of section twenty-five (25), township twelve (12) south, range thirty-six (36) east, Boise meridian; thence west through the center of sections twenty-five (25), twenty-six (26), twenty-seven (27) and to the center of section twenty-eight; thence south on the north and south center line of sections twenty-eight (28) and thirty-three (33), township twelve (12) south, range thirty-six (36) east, Boise meridian, to the top of the crest of the mountains between Malad and Marsh valleys; thence northwesterly along the crest of the mountains between Malad and Marsh valleys to the southeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township eleven (11) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence following the unbroken crest of the main mountain range to the northwest corner of section twenty-three (23), township eleven (11) south, range thirty-five (35) east; thence north one-half (½) mile, to the quarter corner between sections fourteen (14) and fifteen (15); thence west one (1) mile to the quarter corner of sections fifteen (15) and sixteen (16); thence north one-half (½) mile, to the northwest corner of section fifteen (15); thence west one-fourth (¼) mile; thence north one-half (½) mile; thence west one-half (½) mile; thence north one-half (½) mile; thence west one-fourth (¼) mile, to the northwest corner of section nine (9), township eleven (11) south, range thirty-five (35) east; thence north one (1) mile, to the northwest corner of section four (4), township eleven (11) south, range thirty-five (35) east, which is the point of intersection with the township line between townships ten (10) and eleven (11) south, range thirty-five (35) east;

§ 31-139. Owyhee county.

Owyhee county is described as follows: beginning on the Snake river at the mouth of Owyhee river;

Western boundary. Thence south along the eastern boundary line of the state of Oregon to the northern boundary of the state of Nevada;

Southern boundary. Thence east along the northern boundary of the state of Nevada (1 Ter. Sess. 628) to the thirty-eighth (38th) meridian of longitude west from Washington;

Eastern boundary. Thence north along the said meridian to the south boundary of township 7 south range 12 east. Thence west along the south boundary of township 7 south ranges 12, 11, 10 and 9 east to the southwest corner of township 7 south range 9 east. Thence north along the west boundary of township 7 south range 9 east to the northwest corner of said township. Thence east to the southwest corner of township 6 south range 9 east. Thence north along the west boundary of said township to the Snake river;

Northern boundary. Thence down the channel of the Snake river in a westerly direction to the mouth of the Owyhee river, the place of beginning. County seat — Murphy.

§ 31-140. Payette county.

Payette county is described as follows: beginning at the intersection of the north line of township nine (9) north, range five (5) west, with the west line of the state of Idaho, said intersection being the southwest corner of Washington county;

Northern boundary. Thence east a distance of twenty-two (22) miles, more or less, to the northwest corner of section three (3), township nine (9) north, range one (1) west;

Eastern boundary. Thence south on section line six (6) miles, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), said township and range; thence west on the township line between townships eight (8) and nine (9) north, four (4) miles to the northwest corner of section one (1), township eight (8) north, range two (2) west; thence south on section line four (4) miles, to the southwest corner of section twenty-four (24), said township and range; thence west on section line two (2) miles, to the northwest corner of section twenty-seven (27), said township and range; thence south on section line two (2) miles, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), said township and range; thence west on township line between townships seven (7) and eight (8), seven (7) miles, to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township eight (8) north, range three (3) west; thence south on section line twelve (12) miles, to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township six (6) north, range three (3) west;

Southern boundary. Thence west on township line between townships five (5) and six (6), two (2) miles to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) north, range three (3) west; thence south on range line between ranges three (3) and four (4), one-half (½) mile to the east quarter corner of section one (1), township five (5) north, range four (4) west; thence west along the center line of sections one (1) and two (2), said township and range, two (2) miles to the east quarter corner of section three (3), said township and range; thence south along the section line one-half (½) mile, to the southeast corner of section three (3), said township and range; thence west along the section line three (3) miles, to the southwest corner of section five (5), said township and range; thence north along the section line one (1) mile, to the northwest corner of section five (5), said township and range; thence west along the township line between townships five (5) and six (6) north, two (2) miles, to the southwest corner of section thirty-six (36), township six (6) north, range five (5) west; thence north along the section line one (1) mile, to the northwest corner of section thirty-six (36), said township and range; thence west along the section line one (1) mile, to the southwest corner of section twenty-six (26), said township and range; thence north along the section line one (1) mile, to the southwest corner of section twenty-three (23), said township and range; thence west along the section line two (2) miles, to the southwest corner of section twenty-one (21), said township and range; thence north along the section line three (3) miles, to the northwest corner of section nine (9), said township and range; thence west along the section line one and one-half (1 ½) miles, more or less, to an intersection with the west line of the state of Idaho;

Western boundary. Thence in a northerly direction, following the said west boundary line of the state of Idaho, to the point of beginning.

County seat — Payette.